Utah statutes.
58-37f-703.   Reporting certain convictions to practitioners.

(1)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, if the division receives a report from a court under Subsection 41-6a-502(4) or 41-6a-502.5(5)(b) relating to a conviction for driving under the influence of, or while impaired by, a prescribed controlled substance, the division shall:

(a)  attempt to identify, through the database, each practitioner who may have prescribed the controlled substance to the convicted person; and

(b)  provide each practitioner identified under Subsection (1)(a) with:

(i)  a copy of the information provided by the court; and

(ii)  the information obtained from the database that led the division to determine that the practitioner receiving the information may have prescribed the controlled substance to the convicted person.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the information provided under Subsection (1)(b) is provided for the purpose of assisting the practitioner in:

(a)  discussing the manner in which the controlled substance may impact the convicted person's driving;

(b)  advising the convicted person on measures that may be taken to avoid adverse impacts of the controlled substance on future driving; and

(c)  making decisions regarding future prescriptions written for the convicted person.

(3)  Beginning on July 1, 2010, the division shall, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, increase the licensing fee described in Subsection 58-37-6(1)(b) to pay the startup and ongoing costs of the division for complying with the requirements of this section.

